Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 17-21-1001.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-1002.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Partnership Act.”

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-1003.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this chapter applies to all partnerships in existence on January 1, 1994 that were formed under the Wyoming Partnership Act or any predecessor law providing for the formation, operation and liquidation of partnerships.

W.S.

17-21-802

does not apply to a partnership in existence on January 1, 1994 unless the partners agree otherwise.

This chapter does not impair the obligations of a contract existing on January 1, 1994 or affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before January 1, 1994.

A judgment against a partnership or a partner in an action commenced before January 1, 1994 may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment rendered before January 1, 1994.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).